New Jersey, session 221, A988.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  It shall be an unlawful practice for any person to engage in the business of making deferred deposit loans. b.    As used in this section, deferred deposit loan means any transaction in which a short-term cash advance is made to a consumer who is a resident of this State in exchange for the consumers personal check, in the amount of the cash advance plus a fee, whereby the lender agrees to defer depositing or presenting the personal check until a certain date. c.     The provisions of this act shall apply to a deferred deposit loan transaction if the lender, wherever located, induces a consumer to enter into the transaction by any means, including, but not limited to: in-person contact, Internet, mail, telephone, print, radio, or television. d.    A violation of any provision of this section is a violation of P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.), and shall be subject to all remedies and penalties available pursuant to P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.) in addition to any other remedies or penalties provided by law. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.